Washington statutes.
RCW 19.335.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Compensation" means money, property, or anything else of value, which includes, but is not limited to, exclusive arrangements or agreements for the provision of services or the purchase of products.

(2) "Person" includes, where applicable, natural persons, corporations, trusts, unincorporated associations, and partnerships.

(3) "Trade or commerce" includes the marketing or sale of assets, goods, or services, or any commerce directly or indirectly affecting the people of the state of Washington.

(4) "Veterans' benefit matter" means any preparation, presentation, or prosecution of a claim affecting a person who has filed or has expressed an intention to file an application for determination of payment, service, commodity, function, or status, entitlement to which is determined under laws administered by the United States department of veterans affairs or the Washington state department of veterans affairs pertaining to veterans, dependents, and survivors.

[ 2014 c 67 s 2.]